Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 10

Pension Stabilization Reserve Trust

9-4-1001. Pension stabilization reserve trust fund.

The pension stabilization reserve trust is created. The pension stabilization reserve trust fund shall be established and funded through the employer contributions contributed to the trust pursuant to §8-36-920(d)(4), and all income from the investment of the funds in the trust fund. The trust and the funds therein shall be administered by the treasury department. The trust fund shall be an irrevocable trust exclusively for the benefit of the participants and beneficiaries of the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers compiled in title 8, chapter 36, part 9. The assets of the trust fund shall be preserved, invested, and expended solely pursuant to and for the purposes of this part and shall not be loaned or otherwise transferred or used for any other purpose. It shall be impossible, at any time prior to the satisfaction of all liabilities with respect to employees and their beneficiaries under the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers and this trust, for any part of the corpus or income of the trust to be used or diverted for purposes other than for the exclusive benefit of the employees or their beneficiaries. The attorney general and reporter shall approve the terms of the trust instrument.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1; 2018, ch. 590, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1 enacted a new part 57, §§9-4-5701 —9-4-5706, but the part has been redesignated as part 10, §§9-4-1001 —9-4-1006 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1002. Trustees.

The comptroller of the treasury, the commissioner of financial institutions, the commissioner of finance and administration, the secretary of state, and the state treasurer, or their designees, shall serve as trustees of the trust. The comptroller of the treasury shall serve as the chair of the trustees and shall preside over all meetings and proceedings of the trustees.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1 enacted a new part 57, §§9-4-5701 —9-4-5706, but the part has been redesignated as part 10, §§9-4-1001 —9-4-1006 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1003. Investment policy — Individual separate stabilization reserve trust accounts.

The trustees shall adopt an investment policy authorizing how assets in the trust may be invested. The policy shall not authorize assets in the trust to be invested in any instrument, obligation, security, or property that would not constitute a legal investment for assets of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system. The state treasurer shall be responsible for the investment and reinvestment of trust funds in accordance with the policies and guidelines established by the trustees.

The funds transferred or deposited into the trust may be commingled with, co-invested with, and invested or reinvested with other assets transferred or deposited into the trust. All or a portion of the trust may be invested, reinvested, and co-invested with other funds, not a part of the trust, which are held by the state treasurer, including, but not limited to, assets of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system and the state pooled investment fund established pursuant to part 6 of this chapter. The assets of the trust may also be co-invested in a group trust in accordance with § 8-37-104(f).

The trust fund shall consist of the following individual separate stabilization reserve trust accounts for the purpose of accounting for the employer contributions made to the trust on account of:

State employees participating in the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers, compiled in title 8, chapter 36, part 9; and

Teachers participating in the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers.

In addition, the trust fund shall consist of individual separate stabilization reserve trust accounts established in the name of each political subdivision participating in the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers for the purpose of accounting for the employer contributions made to the trust by the political subdivision on account of its employees.

The state treasurer shall assess a charge to the trust, in an amount to be determined by the treasurer, to meet the administrative and investment expenses of the treasury department in providing services under this part.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1; 2018, ch. 590, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1 enacted a new part 57, §§9-4-5701 —9-4-5706, but the part has been redesignated as part 10, §§9-4-1001 —9-4-1006 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1004. Purpose of trust fund — Certification of amount needed to fund benefits — Use of assets.

As provided in this section, the purpose of the pension stabilization reserve trust fund is to protect the participants and beneficiaries of the Hybrid Retirement Plan for State Employees and Teachers from a reduction or loss of benefits through the implementation of the cost controls contained in § 8-36-922(c)(1)(C)-(G) or in § 8-36-922(d)(1). If in any given year, the total amount in an employer's employer reserve account established pursuant to § 8-36-920(e) is not sufficient to meet the actuarial liabilities for which the employer's employer reserve account was created, then the board of trustees of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system shall certify to the trustees of the trust the amount necessary to fund current benefits as determined by the actuarial valuation performed by the retirement system's actuary. Upon receipt of the certification, the trustees of the trust shall determine whether transferring all or a portion of the requested amount from the employer's stabilization reserve trust account to the applicable employer reserve account of the employer would be in the best interests of the trust beneficiaries. If it is, the trustees shall direct the treasurer to transfer such amount as the trustees shall determine from the employer's stabilization reserve trust account to the applicable employer reserve account of the employer.

The assets of the pension stabilization reserve trust fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose set forth in this section and to pay the reasonable expenses incurred in administering and investing the trust assets.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1; 2018, ch. 590, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1 enacted a new part 57, §§9-4-5701 —9-4-5706, but the part has been redesignated as part 10, §§9-4-1001 —9-4-1006 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1005. Suspension of deposits of employer contributions.

Deposits of employer contributions into the pension stabilization reserve trust fund as provided in §8-36-920 shall be suspended effective July 1 of any given year next following the most recent actuarial valuation conducted pursuant to §8-36-922(b) for an employer whose stabilization reserve trust account equals or exceeds a certain maximum amount that is determined by the trustees of the trust created pursuant to this part. The amount shall be expressed in dollars, as a percentage, or other form as shall be determined at the sole discretion of the trustees. The trustees, in consultation with board of trustees of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system and the retirement system's actuary, shall establish the methodology and procedures to be used in ascertaining the maximum amount. Deposits into the pension stabilization reserve trust fund shall be reinstated for the employer effective July 1 of any given year next following the most recent actuarial valuation conducted pursuant to §8-36-922(b) when the total amount in the employer's stabilization reserve trust account is less than the maximum amount adopted by the trustees pursuant to this section.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1 enacted a new part 57, §§9-4-5701 —9-4-5706, but the part has been redesignated as part 10, §§9-4-1001 —9-4-1006 by authority of the Code Commission.

9-4-1006. Annual financial reports.

The trustees shall prepare annual financial reports following the close of each fiscal year relative to the activities of the trust. The annual reports, all books, accounts, and financial records of the trust shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2017, ch. 374, § 1 enacted a new part 57, §§9-4-5701 —9-4-5706, but the part has been redesignated as part 10, §§9-4-1001 —9-4-1006 by authority of the Code Commission.